Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 5. County Commissioners
§ 18-3-524.
Appointments to fill vacancies; term.

Within twenty (20) days after the office of any county commissioner becomes vacant the remaining members of the board shall declare a vacancy to exist and immediately give notice of the vacancy in writing to the chairman of the county central committee of the political party which the member whose office is vacant represented at the time of his election under W.S. 22-6-120(a)(vii), or at the time of his appointment if not elected to office. The chairman of the county central committee shall within twenty (20) days after receipt of the notice call a meeting of the county central committee. At the meeting the committee shall select three (3) persons qualified to fill the vacancy and transmit the names to the board of county commissioners. The board of county commissioners shall fill the vacancy within twenty (20) days after receiving the list from the county central committee by appointing one (1) of the persons whose names are submitted by the county central committee:

If the county central committee fails to select and transmit the list of three (3) names to the board of county commissioners within twenty (20) days, the board shall fill the vacancy by the appointment of any qualified person belonging to the same political party the incumbent commissioner represented at the time of his election or appointment if not elected to office;

If the incumbent commissioner did not represent any political party at the time of his election or appointment, the board of county commissioners shall publish in a newspaper of general circulation in the county notice that within twenty (20) days after publication any qualified person may make application directly to the county commissioners for appointment to fill the vacancy. Within twenty (20) days after the application deadline the county commissioners shall fill the vacancy by appointment of one (1) person qualified from those submitting applications.

If the remaining members of the board of county commissioners fail to fill any vacancy in a board of county commissioners within the time specified in this section, any qualified elector of the county may file a petition with the clerk of the district court of the county in which the vacancy occurred requesting the judge of the district court to fill the vacancy:

Within twenty (20) days after the petition is filed the judge shall fill the vacancy by appointing a qualified elector of the county belonging to the same political party the incumbent commissioner represented at the time of his election or appointment. If the incumbent commissioner did not represent any political party at the time of his election or appointment the judge may appoint any qualified person to fill the vacancy.

Every person appointed county commissioner shall serve until a successor is elected at the next general election and takes office on the first Monday of the following January.

For purposes of this section a person shall be considered to “represent” a political party if he was a nominee of that political party when elected to office or when appointed to fill a vacancy in office.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. I, § 23; R.S. 1887, § 1813; R.S. 1899, § 1069; C.S. 1910, § 1177; Laws 1915, ch. 60, §§ 1 to 4; C.S. 1920, §§ 1372, 1423; R.S. 1931, §§ 30-112, 30-616; Laws 1937, ch. 38, § 1; C.S. 1945, §§ 27-819, 27-820; Laws 1951, ch. 92, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 18-170, 18-171; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 2003, ch. 82, § 1; 2004, ch. 22, § 1; 2011, ch. 115, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to filling vacancies generally, see §§

22-18-101

to

22-18-112

.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a) and (b), clarified procedures for filing vacancies in specified offices, substituting provisions pertaining to a commissioner representing a political party rather than belonging to a political party; and added (d).

Laws 2004, ch. 22, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2004.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a)(ii), substituted “shall publish in a newspaper of general circulation in the county notice that within twenty (20) days after publication any qualified person may make application directly to the county commissioners for appointment to fill the vacancy” for “may appoint any qualified person to fill the vacancy,” and added the last sentence.

Editor's notes. —

This section replaces §§ 22 and 24, art. I, ch. 28, C.L. 1876.

There is no paragraph (b)(ii) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Notification. —

When a county commissioner changes his political affiliation during his term in office and subsequently resigns, board of county commissioners must notify political body to which member belonged at time of last election. Richards v. Board of County Comm'rs, 6 P.3d 1251,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 18-3-525.
Dissolution of boards; procedure.

Each board of county commissioners may dissolve any board or district created under W.S.

18-10-103

,

18-11-101

or chapter 9, article 1 of this title in accordance with the following:

Before any dissolution authorized under this subsection, the board of county commissioners shall at a regular meeting disclose its intent to dissolve a specified board or district. Not later than thirty (30) days before the meeting required under this paragraph, the board of county commissioners shall provide written notice of the date, time and location of the meeting to the affected board or district, which notice shall include an explanation substantiating the reasons for the proposed dissolution. The affected board or district shall be provided sufficient opportunity at the meeting required under this paragraph to respond to the proposed dissolution;

Not later than one hundred twenty (120) days before the proposed dissolution, the board of county commissioners shall publish not less than two (2) times in the newspaper designated under W.S.

18-3-517

a plan to dissolve and terminate the board or district previously created. The plan shall provide for, at a minimum:

Payment of all bonded and other indebtedness against the board or district;

The disposition of assets in accordance with the following:

Any surplus funds remaining to the credit of the board or district, after payment of the indebtedness of the board or district, shall be transferred to the county treasurer for disposition as provided in subdivision (II) of this subparagraph. If the assets of the board or district are insufficient, the board or district shall levy taxes, within the limits of the board’s or district’s authority, for the liquidation of the indebtedness;

Any surplus funds remaining shall be disposed of as provided under one (1) of the following procedures, as selected by the county assessor:

The funds may be offset against the portion of the levies of taxing units levied against the property values of property within the board or district to be dissolved. If the funds are offset as provided under this subdivision, the funds shall be distributed to each taxing unit in the amount of that taxing unit’s offset;

The amount may be credited to each property appearing on the tax roll within the dissolved district or board on the basis of current assessed value. If the surplus funds are distributed under this subdivision, the surplus funds shall be deposited in the unsegregated tax collections account established and distributed in the same manner as other funds in that account.

Resolution or reassignment of all contracts, regulatory agreements and other obligations to which the board or district is a party.

Not later than thirty (30) days before the proposed dissolution, the board of county commissioners shall hold a public meeting and provide an opportunity for public comment both at the meeting and in writing;

After public notice and an opportunity for public comment has been completed, the board of county commissioners may revise the plan for dissolution and shall disapprove or approve by resolution the plan for dissolution and termination of the created board or district.

Upon approval and passage of a resolution dissolving the created board or district, the created board or district shall take all actions necessary to effectuate the plan for dissolution and termination and dissolve and terminate the board or district.

Not later than ninety (90) days after the passage of a resolution dissolving the created board or district, the board or district shall terminate its existence.

History.

2022 ch. 92, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Effective date. —

Laws 2022, ch, 92, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2022.